Hawaii statutes.
§554G-10 Effect of avoidance of permitted
transfers. (a) A creditor may avoid a permitted transfer pursuant to
section 554G-8 only to the extent necessary to satisfy the transferor's
debt to the creditor at whose instance the transfer has been avoided, together
with costs including attorney's fees as allowed by a court.

(b) In an action pursuant to subsection (a) to
avoid a permitted transfer:

(1) If a court finds that a trustee has not acted
with intent to defraud, hinder, or delay the creditor in accepting or
administering the property that is the subject of the permitted transfer:

(A) The trustee shall have a first and
paramount lien against the property that is the subject of the permitted
transfer in an amount equal to the entire cost including attorney's fees
properly incurred by the trustee in the defense of the action or proceedings to
avoid the permitted transfer;

(B) The permitted transfer shall be avoided,
subject to payment of proper fees, costs, preexisting rights, claims, and
interests of the trustee and of any predecessor trustee who has not acted with
intent to defraud, hinder, or delay the creditor; and

(C) For purposes of this paragraph, it shall
be presumed that the trustee did not act with intent to defraud, hinder, or
delay the creditor merely by accepting the property; and

(2) If the court is satisfied that a beneficiary of
the trust has not acted with intent to defraud, hinder, or delay the creditor,
the permitted transfer shall be avoided subject to the beneficiary's right to
retain any distribution made prior to the creditor's commencement of an action
to avoid the permitted transfer; provided that for purposes of this paragraph,
it shall be presumed that a beneficiary did not act with intent to defraud,
hinder, or delay the creditor merely by creating the trust or by accepting a
distribution made in accordance with the terms of the trust.

(c) A creditor who brings an action pursuant
to section 554G-8 to avoid a permitted trust shall have the burden of
proving by clear and convincing evidence that a trustee or beneficiary acted
with intent to defraud, hinder, or delay the creditor; provided that in the
case of a beneficiary who is also the transferor, the burden on the creditor
shall be to prove by a preponderance of the evidence that the
transferor-beneficiary acted with intent to defraud, hinder, or delay the
creditor.

(d) For purposes of this chapter, attachment,
garnishment, sequestration, or other legal or equitable process shall be
permitted only where permitted by the express terms of this chapter.

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of
this chapter, a creditor shall have no right against the interest of a
beneficiary to a trust based solely on the beneficiary's right to authorize or
direct the trustee to use all or part of the trust property to pay:

(1) Estate or inheritance taxes imposed upon or due
to the beneficiary's estate;

(2) Debts of the beneficiary's estate; or

(3) Expenses of administering the beneficiary's
estate,

unless the beneficiary actually directs the payment
of taxes, debts, or expenses and then only to the extent of that direction.

(f) Where spouses make a permitted transfer of
property and, immediately before the permitted transfer, the property, any part
of the permitted property, or any accumulation to the permitted property was,
pursuant to applicable law, owned by them as tenants by the entirety, then
notwithstanding the permitted transfer and except where the provisions of the
trust instrument expressly provide to the contrary, the property and any
accumulation to the property, while held in trust during the lifetime of both
spouses, shall be treated as though it were held in tenancy by the entirety and
shall be subject to all applicable law; provided that in every other respect, the
property shall be subject to the terms of the trust instrument.

In any action concerning whether a creditor of
either or both spouses may recover the debt from the trust, upon avoidance of
the permitted transfer the sole remedy available to the creditor with respect
to trust property treated as though it were held in tenancy by the entirety
shall be an order directing the trustee to transfer the property to both
spouses as tenants by the entirety.

(g) Subject to all of the provisions of this
section and except as otherwise provided in subsection (f), upon avoidance of a
qualified disposition to the extent permitted under subsection (a), the sole
remedy available to the creditor shall be an order directing the trustee to
transfer to the transferor the amount necessary to satisfy the transferor's
debt to the creditor at whose instance the disposition has been avoided. [L
2010, c 182, pt of §2; am L 2011, c 161, §10]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next